Arkansas, session 2025, SB617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 22-3-302, concerning the purpose and
creation of the Capitol Zoning District, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(c)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (c)(2) of this section, in
addition to the areas described under subsections (a) and (b) of this
section, the Capitol Zoning District shall also include all streets, paths,
bike lanes, and rights-of-way within a one-mile radius of the State Capitol.
(2) The streets, paths, bike lanes, and rights-of-way under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall not include those state highways as
designated under § 27-67-201.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 22-3-304 is amended to read as follows:
22-3-304. Zoning authority of Capitol Zoning District Commission.
The Capitol Zoning District Commission is authorized broad scope in its
*LGL184*
04/03/2025 8:14:02 AM LGL184

SB617
zoning authority to include, but not be limited to, without limitation the
following:
(1) Restrictions on the height, number of stories, and size of
buildings;
(2) Percentage of lots that may be occupied;
(3) Use of structures and land;
(4) Population density;
(5) Amount of open space;
(6) Parking areas; and
(7) Restriction of noisy and polluting processes or those
endangering the health and safety of the citizens of the zoning district; and
(8) Design of streets, paths, bike lanes, and rights-of-way,
except those state highways as designated under § 27-67-201, within a one-
mile radius of the State Capitol.






















04/03/2025 8:14:02 AM LGL184